Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 10. University of Wyoming Athletics Challenge Fund

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 61, § 1, and Laws 2004, ch. 117, § 1, both enacted an article 10 in chapter 16 of this title. The provisions enacted by Laws 2004, ch. 117, § 1, were redesignated as article 11 (§§

21-16-1101

through

21-16-1104

) by the legislative service office.

Appropriations. —

See Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 3, subsection 67, for an appropriation to the university athletics challenge account established under §

21-16-113

, if this bill was enacted into law.

Effective date. —

Laws 2004, ch. 61, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

§ 21-16-1001.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Challenge account” means the university athletics challenge account established under W.S.

21-16-1002

;

“Qualifying contribution” means a transfer of money or other property of a value of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) to the University of Wyoming foundation to be expended exclusively for university intercollegiate athletic facilities consistent with the 2003 intercollegiate athletics plan approved by the university board of trustees. The commitment for a qualifying contribution or the contribution itself shall be made on or after September 13, 2003. The contribution shall be actually received by the University of Wyoming foundation on or before December 31 of the fifth calendar year following the calendar year in which the written commitment was made to the university foundation. Members of a single family may aggregate their individual gifts to meet the minimum dollar threshold required for matching funds. Gifts from nonfamily members in memory of a deceased individual may also be aggregated to meet the minimum dollar threshold required for matching funds.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 52, § 3.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 61, § 1; 2005, ch. 88, § 1; 2006, ch. 70, § 2; 2009, ch. 52, §§ 1, 3.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(ii), inserted provisions pertaining to W.S. 21-16-1003(a)(vii); and added (a)(iii).

The 2006 amendment,

in (a)(ii), substituted “2009” for “2006,” substituted “2011” for “2008,” and added the last sentence.

Laws 2006, ch. 70, § 4(b), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(ii), deleted “except as provided in W.S. 21-16-1003(a)(vii)” following “($25,000.00),” deleted “and also includes contributions meeting the requirements of W.S. 21 16 1003(a)(vii)” at the end of the first sentence, substituted “on or after” for “during the period of time beginning,” deleted “and ending December 31, 2009” at the end of the second sentence, and substituted “of the fifth calendar year following the calendar year in which the written commitment was made to the university foundation” for “2011” in the third sentence; repealed former (a)(iii) which defined the “The challenge eight account”; and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 21-16-1002.
University athletics challenge account.

The university athletics challenge account is created.

The state treasurer shall invest amounts deposited within the account in accordance with law. All investment earnings shall be credited to the general fund. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

, 9-2-1012(e) or

9-4-207

, other funds within the account shall not lapse or revert until directed by the legislature and shall remain available for distribution as provided in this article.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 61, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 52, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “ within the earmarked revenue fund” from the end of (a).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added the last sentence of (b).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 21-16-1003.
Athletics challenge matching program; state treasurer to administer program account; matching payments; conditions; annual reports; reversion of appropriations.

The state treasurer shall administer the university athletics challenge account established under this article. The following shall apply:

To the extent that funds are available in the challenge account, the state treasurer shall match each qualifying contribution actually received by the University of Wyoming foundation by transferring from the challenge account to the university an amount equal to the amount of the qualifying contribution. Qualifying contributions made directly to the university shall be considered qualifying contributions to the foundation for purposes of this article. The university shall expend both the qualifying contributions and the matching funds solely for the cost of establishing new or renovating existing university intercollegiate athletics facilities consistent with the 2003 intercollegiate athletics plan approved by the university board of trustees. Authorized expenditures for intercollegiate athletic facilities include but are not limited to all expenditures necessary for planning, designing, procuring contractors, construction management and actual construction;

The state treasurer shall make transfers to the university under this section not later than the end of the calendar quarter following the quarter during which the qualifying contribution is received. Matching funds shall only be available for expenditure to the extent cash or cash equivalent contributions are actually received by the University of Wyoming. If a qualifying contribution is made through a series of payments or transfers, no matching funds shall be transferred by the state treasurer until the total value of all payments or transfers actually received toward the contribution totals at least twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00). Thereafter, matching funds shall be transferred as payments or transfers toward that qualifying contribution are received by the foundation;

The state treasurer shall distribute funds or encumber funds for future distribution in the case of a written commitment, to match a qualifying contribution based on the order in which each qualifying contribution is actually received or in which a written commitment to make a qualifying contribution is received by the foundation. Matching funds shall not be distributed or encumbered in excess of the amount within the challenge account. No matching funds shall be transferred to the university except to match qualifying contributions actually received. The state treasurer shall rescind an encumbrance if the university notifies him that a donor who made a commitment will not make a qualifying contribution that is eligible for matching funds under this section;

For the purpose of calculating the matching amount only, the state treasurer shall use the value of a qualifying contribution based on its fair market value at the time the contribution is received by the university foundation. The university shall provide evidence of fair market value as the state treasurer requires for each qualifying contribution. The state treasurer’s office shall not bear any costs associated with providing evidence;

The University of Wyoming shall on or before October 1 of each calendar year submit a report to the state treasurer from the university foundation regarding the matching program established under this section for the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include a financial summary and a review of the accomplishments resulting from program expenditures. The state treasurer shall distribute the report to the governor and the joint education interim committee.

and (vii) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 52, § 3.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 61, § 1; 2005, ch. 88, § 1; ch. 230, § 4; 2006, ch. 70, § 2; 2009, ch. 52, §§ 1, 3; 2017 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added (a)(vii), and in (a)(i) and (a)(ii), inserted exceptions pertaining to (a)(vii).

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 230, § 4, in (a)(vii)(A), substituted “September 16, 2001” for “September 13, 2001.”

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 13, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

See the conflicting legislation note below. This section is set out incorporating the changes made by both 2005 acts.

The 2006 amendment,

in (a)(v), substituted “2011” for “2008,” deleted “endowment” preceding “program” and made a similar change, and substituted “joint education interim committee” for “legislature.”

Laws 2006, ch. 70, § 4(b), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “Except as provided in paragraph (vii) of this subsection” at the beginning of the third sentence of (a)(i); deleted “Except as provided in subparagraph (vii)(B) of this subsection” at the beginning of the second sentence of (a)(ii); deleted “Through calendar year 2011” at the beginning of (a)(v); repealed former (a)(vi) and (a)(vii) pertaining to unexpended funds reverting to the general fund, and the creation of the challenge eight account; and made related changes.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(ii), inserted the second sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.” Section 4 of the act, however, makes an exception in the case of passage of House Enrolled Act 64, which was enacted as Laws 2005, ch. 88.